Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5463.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7. (1) Within 60 days after receipt of an approved application or an appeal of a disapproved application that was submitted to the commission before October 31 of that year, the commission shall determine whether the facility is a speculative building or designed and acquired primarily for the purpose of restoration or replacement of obsolete industrial property or the construction of new industrial property, and whether the facility otherwise complies with section 9 and with the other provisions of this act. If the commission so finds, it shall issue an industrial facilities exemption certificate. Before issuing a certificate the commission shall must notify the state treasurer of the application and shall must obtain the written concurrence of the department of licensing and regulatory affairs that the application complies with the requirements in section 9. Except as otherwise provided in this section and section 7a, the effective date of the certificate for a replacement facility, or new facility, speculative building, or portion of a speculative building is the immediately succeeding December 31 following the date the certificate is issued. For a speculative building or a portion of a speculative building, except as otherwise provided in section 7a, the effective date of the certificate is the immediately succeeding December 31 following the date the speculative building, or the portion of a speculative building, is used as a manufacturing facility. (2) The commission shall send an industrial facilities exemption certificate, when issued, by mail to the applicant, and a certified copy by mail to the assessor of the assessing unit in which the facility is located or to be located, and that copy shall must be filed in his or her the assessor's office. Notice of the commission's refusal to issue a certificate shall must be sent by mail to the same persons. (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if on December 29, 1986 a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an exemption certificate for 10 years for real and personal property but the commission did not receive the application until 1992 and the application was not made complete until 1995, then the commission shall issue, for that property, an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins December 30, 1987 and ends December 30, 1997. (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if pursuant to under section 16a a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an industrial facilities exemption certificate for a new facility on October 14, 2003 for a certificate that expired in December 2002, the commission shall issue for that property an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins on December 30, 2002 and ends December 30, 2009. (5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if on or before February 10, 2007 a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an amendment of an industrial facilities exemption certificate for a replacement facility and that certificate was revoked by the commission effective December 30, 2005 with the order of revocation issued by the commission on April 10, 2006, notwithstanding the revocation, the commission shall retroactively amend the certificate and give full effect to the amended certificate , which shall that must include the additional personal property expenditures described in the resolution amending the certificate, for the period of time beginning when the certificate was originally approved until the certificate was revoked. (6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if on July 23, 2012, a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an industrial facilities exemption certificate for a new facility, but the application was not made complete until 2013, the commission shall issue for that property an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins on December 31, 2012 and ends December 31, 2024. (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if on February 21, 2012, a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an industrial facilities exemption certificate for a new facility, but the application was not made complete until 2013, the commission shall issue for that property an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins on December 31, 2012. (8) If the commission receives an application under this act for an industrial facilities exemption certificate for a new facility or a replacement facility and the application is made complete before October 31 following the year in which the application is received by the commission, the commission may issue for that property an industrial facilities exemption certificate that has an effective date of December 31 of the year in which the application was received by the commission. (9) If an error or mistake in an application for an industrial facilities exemption certificate is discovered after the local governmental unit has passed a resolution approving the application or after the commission has issued a certificate for the application, an applicant may submit an amended application in the same manner as an original application under this act that corrects the error or mistake. The legislative body of the local governmental unit and the commission may approve or deny the amended application. If the commission previously issued a certificate for the original application and approves an amended application under this subsection, the commission shall issue an amended certificate for the amended application with the same effective date as the original certificate. (10) If the clerk of the qualified local governmental unit failed to forward an application, an amended or transfer application, or a request to revoke a certificate that was approved by the legislative body of the qualified local governmental unit before October 31 of that year to the commission before October 31 but filed the application, the amended or transfer application, or the request to revoke a certificate before October 31 of the immediately succeeding year and the commission approves the application, the amended or transfer application, or the request to revoke a certificate, notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the certificate shall be is considered to be issued, transferred, amended, or revoked on December 31 of the year in which the local governmental unit approved the application, the amended or transfer application, or the request to revoke the certificate. (11) Beginning October 1, 2013, the commission shall do all of the following for each industrial facilities exemption certificate approved or disapproved by the commission under subsection (8), (9), or (10): (a) Notify the office of the member of the house of representatives of this state and the office of the senator of this state, who represent the geographic area in which the property covered by the application for a certificate is located, that an application for a certificate has been approved or disapproved under subsection (8), (9), or (10). (b) Publish on its website a copy of the certificate if approved, or a copy of the denial notice if disapproved, under subsection (8), (9), or (10) and whatever additional information the commission considers appropriate regarding the application. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5464 (request no. H02895'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.